Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-405
Ambulatory surgical center, defined.

(1) Ambulatory surgical center means a facility (a) where surgical services are provided to persons not requiring hospitalization who are discharged from such facility within twenty-three hours and fifty-nine minutes from the time of admission, (b) which meets all applicable requirements for licensure as a health clinic under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, and (c) which has qualified for a written agreement with the Health Care Financing Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services or its successor to participate in medicare as an ambulatory surgical center as defined in 42 C.F.R. 416 et seq. or which receives other third-party reimbursement for such services.

(2) Ambulatory surgical center does not include an office or clinic used solely by a practitioner or group of practitioners in the practice of medicine, dentistry, or podiatry.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB783, § 2.